src/assets/uz-lat.aff
SFX X 0 mayotgandeksizmikan .
SFX X 0 mayotgandeksanlar .
SFX X 0 mayotgandeksanlar-a .
SFX X 0 mayotgandeksanlarki .
SFX X 0 mayotgandeksanlar-ku .
SFX X 0 mayotgandeksanlar-da .
SFX X 0 mayotgandeksanlar-u .
SFX X 0 mayotgandeksanlar-ov .
SFX X 0 mayotgandeksanlarmi .
SFX X 0 mayotgandeksanlarmikan .
SFX X 0 mayotgandeksizlar .
SFX X 0 mayotgandeksizlar-a .
SFX X 0 mayotgandeksizlarki .
SFX X 0 mayotgandeksizlar-ku .
SFX X 0 mayotgandeksizlar-da .
SFX X 0 mayotgandeksizlar-u .
SFX X 0 mayotgandeksizlar-ov .
SFX X 0 mayotgandeksizlarmi .
SFX X 0 mayotgandeksizlarmikan .
SFX X 0 mayotgandeklar .
SFX X 0 mayotgandeklar-a .
SFX X 0 mayotgandeklarki .
SFX X 0 mayotgandeklar-ku .
SFX X 0 mayotgandeklar-da .
SFX X 0 mayotgandeklar-u .
SFX X 0 mayotgandeklar-ov .
SFX X 0 mayotgandeklarmi .
SFX X 0 mayotgandeklarmikan .
SFX X 0 yotgandek-a [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandekman [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandekman-a [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandekmanki [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandekman-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandekman-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandekman-u [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandekman-ov [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandekmanmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandekmanmikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandekmiz [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandekmiz-a [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandekmizki [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandekmiz-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandekmiz-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandekmiz-u [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandekmiz-ov [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandekmizmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandekmizmikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksan-a [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksanki [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksan-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksan-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksan-u [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksan-ov [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksanmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksanmikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksiz [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksiz-a [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksizki [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksiz-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksiz-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksiz-u [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksiz-ov [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksizmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksizmikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksanlar [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksanlar-a [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksanlarki [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksanlar-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksanlar-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksanlar-u [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksanlar-ov [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksanlarmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksanlarmikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksizlar [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksizlar-a [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksizlarki [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksizlar-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksizlar-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksizlar-u [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksizlar-ov [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksizlarmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeksizlarmikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeklar [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeklar-a [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeklarki [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeklar-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeklar-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeklar-u [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeklar-ov [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeklarmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandeklarmikan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandek-a [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandekman [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandekman-a [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandekmanki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandekman-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandekman-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandekman-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandekman-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandekmanmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandekmanmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandekmiz [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandekmiz-a [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandekmizki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandekmiz-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandekmiz-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandekmiz-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandekmiz-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandekmizmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandekmizmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksan-a [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksanki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksan-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksan-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksan-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksan-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksanmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksanmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksiz [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksiz-a [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksizki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksiz-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksiz-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksiz-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksiz-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksizmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksizmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksanlar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksanlar-a [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksanlarki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksanlar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksanlar-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksanlar-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksanlar-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksanlarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksanlarmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksizlar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksizlar-a [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksizlarki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksizlar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksizlar-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksizlar-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksizlar-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksizlarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeksizlarmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeklar [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeklar-a [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeklarki [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeklar-ku [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeklar-da [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeklar-u [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeklar-ov [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeklarmi [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 ayotgandeklarmikan [^aeiou]
SFX X 0 mayotgandir .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirki .
SFX X 0 mayotgandir-ku .
SFX X 0 mayotgandir-da .
SFX X 0 mayotgandir-u .
SFX X 0 mayotgandir-ov .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirmi .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirman .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirmanki .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirman-ku .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirman-da .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirman-u .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirman-ov .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirmanmi .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirmiz .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirmizki .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirmiz-ku .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirmiz-da .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirmiz-u .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirmiz-ov .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirmizmi .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirsan .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirsanki .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirsan-ku .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirsan-da .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirsan-u .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirsan-ov .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirsanmi .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirsiz .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirsizki .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirsiz-ku .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirsiz-da .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirsiz-u .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirsiz-ov .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirsizmi .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirsanlar .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirsanlarki .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirsanlar-ku .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirsanlar-da .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirsanlar-u .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirsanlar-ov .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirsanlarmi .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirsizlar .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirsizlarki .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirsizlar-ku .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirsizlar-da .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirsizlar-u .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirsizlar-ov .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirsizlarmi .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirlar .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirlarki .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirlar-ku .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirlar-da .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirlar-u .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirlar-ov .
SFX X 0 mayotgandirlarmi .
SFX X 0 yotgandir [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirki [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandir-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandir-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandir-u [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandir-ov [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirman [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirmanki [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirman-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirman-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirman-u [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirman-ov [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirmanmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirmiz [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirmizki [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirmiz-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirmiz-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirmiz-u [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirmiz-ov [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirmizmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirsan [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirsanki [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirsan-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirsan-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirsan-u [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirsan-ov [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirsanmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirsiz [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirsizki [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirsiz-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirsiz-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirsiz-u [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirsiz-ov [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirsizmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirsanlar [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirsanlarki [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirsanlar-ku [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirsanlar-da [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirsanlar-u [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirsanlar-ov [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirsanlarmi [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirsizlar [aeiou]
SFX X 0 yotgandirsizlarki [aeiou]
